Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1049.
do enact as follows:AB1049,11Section 1. 71.05 (6) (b) 57. of the statutes is created to read:AB1049,2,8271.05 (6) (b) 57. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, income 3received by the owner of a community, as defined in s. 710.15 (1) (ad), in this state 4from the sale of the community to a homeowner’s association, cooperative, or 5membership organization, any group composed entirely of homeowners, a nonprofit 6organization, or a nonprofit affordable housing developer if the sale is approved by 7more than 51 percent of the occupants, as defined in s. 710.15 (1) (c), and residents, 8as defined in s. 710.15 (1) (f), of the community.AB1049,29Section 2. 71.26 (2) (a) 13. of the statutes is created to read:AB1049,3,61071.26 (2) (a) 13. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, minus 1the income received by the owner of a community, as defined in s. 710.15 (1) (ad), in 2this state from the sale of the community to a homeowner’s association, cooperative, 3or membership organization, any group composed entirely of homeowners, a 4nonprofit organization, or a nonprofit affordable housing developer if the sale is 5approved by more than 51 percent of the occupants, as defined in s. 710.15 (1) (c), 6and residents, as defined in s. 710.15 (1) (f), of the community.AB1049,37Section 3. 71.45 (2) (a) 25. of the statutes is created to read:AB1049,3,15871.45 (2) (a) 25. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, by 9subtracting from federal taxable income the income received by the owner of a 10community, as defined in s. 710.15 (1) (ad), in this state from the sale of the 11community to a homeowner’s association, cooperative, or membership organization, 12any group composed entirely of homeowners, a nonprofit organization, or a 13nonprofit affordable housing developer if the sale is approved by more than 51 14percent of the occupants, as defined in s. 710.15 (1) (c), and residents, as defined in 15s. 710.15 (1) (f), of the community.AB1049,416Section 4. 101.935 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1049,3,2117101.935 (2) (a) The department or a village, city or county granted agent 18status under par. (e) shall issue permits to and regulate manufactured home 19communities. No person, state or local government who has not been issued a 20permit under this subsection may conduct, maintain, manage or operate a 21manufactured home community.AB1049,522Section 5. 101.935 (2) (e) of the statutes is repealed.AB1049,623Section 6. 101.935 (2m) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1049,4,21101.935 (2m) (a) (intro.) The department shall inspect a manufactured home 2community annually and in the following situations:AB1049,73Section 7. 101.935 (2n) of the statutes is created to read:AB1049,4,94101.935 (2n) The department shall review and attempt to resolve any 5complaint received under s. 710.15 (9). After reviewing the complaint, if the 6department determines that another agency or unit of government is best able to 7resolve the matter, the department shall forward the complaint to that agency or 8unit of government. The department shall timely notify the complainant of all of 9the department’s actions under this subsection.AB1049,810Section 8. 710.15 (1) (ah) of the statutes is created to read:AB1049,4,1211710.15 (1) (ah) “Maintenance costs for which the community owner is solely 12responsible” means all of the following:AB1049,4,15131. The cost of regular maintenance and repair of all roads, sidewalks, parking 14pads, stormwater drainage systems, and common areas that are part of the 15community.AB1049,4,17162. The maintenance, care, removal, and replacement of all trees within the 17community.AB1049,4,20183. The routine maintenance and repair of all sewer lines, water lines, utility 19service lines, and related connections owned and provided by the community owner 20or operator to the sites.AB1049,921Section 9. 710.15 (1) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:AB1049,5,322710.15 (1) (cm) “Operating expenses” means taxes, insurance, utility charges, 23onsite employee costs, maintenance costs for which the community owner is solely 24responsible, and 3rd-party charges that are directly necessary for operating the 1community. “Operating expenses” does not include any cost related to acquisition, 2capital improvements, debt service, or any increase in the return on the community 3owner’s investment.AB1049,104Section 10. 710.15 (2n) of the statutes is created to read:AB1049,5,105710.15 (2n) Evacuation plan. Each community owner shall develop a plan 6for evacuating the community residents and occupants in the event of a natural 7disaster or other emergency, and the community rules shall specify the procedures 8for using the plan. No plan developed under this subsection may take effect without 9the approval of the governing body of the municipality where the community is 10located.AB1049,1111Section 11. 710.15 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB1049,5,1412710.15 (7) Resident right to purchase. (a) A community owner shall 13provide written notice of any intent to close the community or convert it to another 14use at least 12 months before the closure or change in use will occur. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1049 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1049 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1049 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1049 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1049: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting